output.aff
SFX J N 132
SFX J   iec         ce         iec
SFX J   iec         ca         iec
SFX J   iec         cov        iec
SFX J   iec         cu         iec
SFX J   iec         com        iec
SFX J   iec         ci         iec
SFX J   iec         coch       iec
SFX J   iec         cami       iec
SFX J   ec          ce         [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          ca         [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          cov        [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          cu         [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          com        [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          ci         [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          coch       [^i]ec
SFX J   ec          cami       [^i]ec
SFX J   0           e          [^e]c
SFX J   0           a          [^e]c
SFX J   0           ov         [^e]c
SFX J   0           u          [^e]c
SFX J   0           om         [^e]c
SFX J   0           i          [^e]c
SFX J   0           och        [^e]c
SFX J   0           mi         [^e]c
SFX J   ol          le         ol
SFX J   ol          la         ol
SFX J   ol          lov        ol
SFX J   ol          lu         ol
SFX J   ol          lom        ol
SFX J   ol          li         ol
SFX J   ol          loch       ol
SFX J   ol          lami       ol
SFX J   0           e          [^o]l
SFX J   0           a          [^o]l
SFX J   0           ov         [^o]l
SFX J   0           u          [^o]l
SFX J   0           om         [^o]l
SFX J   0           i          [^o]l
SFX J   0           och        [^o]l
SFX J   0           ami        [^o]l
SFX J   el          le         zel
SFX J   el          la         zel
SFX J   el          lov        zel
SFX J   el          lu         zel
SFX J   el          lom        zel
SFX J   el          li         zel
SFX J   el          loch       zel
SFX J   el          lami       zel
SFX J   0           a          [^pz][e]l
SFX J   l           le         [^z][e]l
SFX J   l           li         [^z][e]l
SFX J   en          ni         [dz]en
SFX J   en          na         [dz]en
SFX J   en          ni         den
SFX J   en          nu         [dz]en
SFX J   en          nom        [dz]en
SFX J   en          noch       [dz]en
SFX J   en          nami       [dz]en
SFX J   en          ne         zen
SFX J   en          nov        zen
SFX J   n           ne         [^dz]en
SFX J   n           na         [^dz]en
SFX J   0           ov         [^dz]en
SFX J   n           nu         [^dz]en
SFX J   n           nom        [^dz]en
SFX J   n           ni         [^dz]en
SFX J   n           noch       [^dz]en
SFX J   0           mi         [^dz]en
SFX J   er          re         er
SFX J   er          ra         er
SFX J   er          rov        er
SFX J   er          ru         er
SFX J   er          rom        er
SFX J   er          ri         er
SFX J   er          roch       er
SFX J   er          rami       er
SFX J   or          re         or
SFX J   or          ra         or
SFX J   or          rov        or
SFX J   or          ru         or
SFX J   or          rom        or
SFX J   or          ri         or
SFX J   or          roch       or
SFX J   or          rami       or
SFX J   0           e          [^o]r
SFX J   0           a          [^o]r
SFX J   0           ov         [^o]r
SFX J   0           u          [^o]r
SFX J   0           om         [^o]r
SFX J   0           i          [^o]r
SFX J   0           och        [^o]r
SFX J   0           ami        [^o]r
SFX J   os          ose        os
SFX J   os          osa        os
SFX J   os          osov       os
SFX J   os          osu        os
SFX J   os          osom       os
SFX J   os          osi        os
SFX J   os          osoch      os
SFX J   os          osmi       os
SFX J   et          te         et
SFX J   et          ta         et
SFX J   et          tov        et
SFX J   et          tu         et
SFX J   et          tom        et
SFX J   et          ti         et
SFX J   et          toch       et
SFX J   et          tami       et
SFX J   oz          oze        oz
SFX J   oz          oza        oz
SFX J   oz          ozov       oz
SFX J   oz          ozu        oz
SFX J   oz          ozom       oz
SFX J   oz          ozi        oz
SFX J   oz          ozoch      oz
SFX J   oz          ozmi       oz
SFX J   0           e          [e][^clnr]
SFX J   0           a          [e][^clnr]
SFX J   0           ov         [e][^cnr]
SFX J   0           u          [e][^cnr]
SFX J   0           om         [e][^cnr]
SFX J   0           i          [e][^clnr]
SFX J   0           och        [e][^cnr]
SFX J   0           mi         [e][^cnr]
SFX J   0           e          [^celnrsz]
SFX J   0           a          [^celnrsz]
SFX J   0           ov         [^celnrsz]
SFX J   0           u          [^celnrsz]
SFX J   0           om         [^celnrsz]
SFX J   0           i          [^celnrsz]
SFX J   0           och        [^celnrsz]
SFX J   0           mi         [^celnrsz]

SFX L N 60
SFX L   0           e          c
SFX L   ec          ce         ec
SFX L   ec          ca         ec
SFX L   ec          cov        ec
SFX L   ec          covi       ec
SFX L   ec          com        ec
SFX L   ec          coch       ec
SFX L   ec          cami       ec
SFX L   0           via        o
SFX L   o           a          o
SFX L   0           v          o
SFX L   0           vi         o
SFX L   0           m          o
SFX L   0           ch         o
SFX L   0           m          o
SFX L   o           ami        o
SFX L   0           e          ar
SFX L   0           y          [tv]er
SFX L   0           a          [tv]er
SFX L   0           ov         [tv]er
SFX L   0           ovi        [tv]er
SFX L   0           om         [tv]er
SFX L   0           och        [tv]er
SFX L   0           mi         [tv]er
SFX L   er          re         [^tv]er
SFX L   er          ra         [^tv]er
SFX L   er          rov        [^tv]er
SFX L   er          rovi       [^tv]er
SFX L   er          rom        [^tv]er
SFX L   er          roch       [^tv]er
SFX L   er          rami       [^tv]er
SFX L   0           y          [^ae][cr]
SFX L   0           a          [^e][cr]
SFX L   0           ov         [^e][cr]
SFX L   0           ovi        [^e][cr]
SFX L   0           om         [^e][cr]
SFX L   0           och        [^e][cr]
SFX L   0           mi         [^e][cr]
SFX L   es          sy         es
SFX L   es          sa         es
SFX L   es          sov        es
SFX L   es          sovi       es
SFX L   es          som        es
SFX L   es          soch       es
SFX L   es          sami       es
SFX L   0           y          [^cceior]
SFX L   0           a          [^ceior]
SFX L   0           ov         [^ceior]
SFX L   0           ovi        [^ceior]
SFX L   0           om         [^ceior]
SFX L   0           och        [^ceior]
SFX L   0           mi         [^ceior]
SFX L   us          a          us
SFX L   us          ovi        us
SFX L   us          om         us
SFX L   us          y          us
SFX L   us          ov         us
SFX L   us          om         us
SFX L   us          och        us
SFX L   us          ami        us
