output.dic
aids/J
aligator/L
amfiteater/J
ampermeter/J
ar/J
artikel/J
autobazar/J
bagatel/J
Banglades/J
baranok/L
bedeker/J
behun/CJ
belan/L
betlehemec/J
bezstavovec/L
bic/J
binokular/J
blsacinec/J
blyskac/J
bobor/L
bocian/L
boj/J
Bombaj/J
borsc/J
brav/L
breviar/J
brmbolec/J
brontosaurus/L
Brunej/J
buchar/J
buldog/L
bundas/J
bus/J
byk/L
bylinozravec/L
capko/BL
cedeprehravac/J
cencul/J
centiliter/J
ciagel/J
cicavec/L
ciel/J
cinovec/J
cumel/J
cylinder/J
caj/J
casovac/J
cernobyl/J
cerv/L
cervotoc/J
cistec/J
citatel/CJ
cizik/L
ciz/L
crviacik/L
crvoc/J
cuvac/L
datel/L
davkovac/J
debakel/J
deciliter/J
dej/J
dekoder/L
delenec/J
demars/J
den/J
depozitar/J
desatorak/L
desattisic/J
dieferencial/J
dierkovac/J
dinar/J
dinosaurus/L
distanc/J
dolar/J
dopredaj/J
drazdec/J
drozd/L
Dubaj/J
Dunaj/J
dvojkopytnik/L
dvorec/J
dzganec/J
elektrospotrebic/J
evanjeliar/J
expozimeter/J
fals/J
februar/J
fiaker/J
filc/J
flajster/J
flys/J
formovac/CJ
fortiel/J
frkanec/J
fukso/L
galimatias/J
Gibraltar/J
golier/J
Greenwich/J
grizly/L
gros/J
gulas/J
gvas/J
had/L
haj/J
halier/J
hangar/J
hardver/BJ
hasis/J
hektar/J
herbar/J
hermafrodit/L
hexameter/J
hlac/L
hlavacik/L
hlavac/L
hlavonozec/CL
hluchan/L
hmyzozravec/CL
hnedel/J
Hnilec/J
hobel/J
hokej/J
holan/L
honorar/J
hostinec/J
hrbolec/J
hreben/J
hriankovac/J
hrvol/J
husacinec/J
chladic/J
chochol/J
chranic/J
chriastel/J
chudobinec/J
chumac/J
ibis/J
inotaj/J
inventar/J
istic/J
jager/J
jaguar/L
januar/J
jarkovac/J
jazvec/CL
jezko/L
jez/L
jezohlav/L
jul/L
kabatec/J
kahanec/J
kalander/J
kalendar/J
kamenec/J
kanal/BJ
kapec/J
kasel/J
katalog/J
kataster/J
kaviar/J
kefar/J
keper/J
kilometer/J
kindzal/J
klavir/J
kliest/L
klimax/J
klokoc/J
Kluz/J
knihtlaciaren/J
kociar/J
koja/J
kokerspaniel/L
kolotoc/J
konar/J
kon/CL
koniec/J
kopanec/J
kopkovac/J
koral/J
koren/J
korovec/CL
kosostvorec/J
kos/J
kotol/J
kotuc/J
kovopriemysel/J
kozol/L
kozorozec/L
krab/L
krajac/J
kraj/J
kraz/J
krdel/J
kreker/J
kremen/J
kristal/J
kriz/J
krompac/J
kropaj/J
krtinec/J
krtko/L
krvel/J
kufor/J
kuloar/J
kuracinec/J
kuzel/J
kvapel/J
kvarter/J
kybel/J
kyl/J
Laborec/J
ladovec/J
laket/J
latovec/J
lemes/J
lenoch/CL
liatovec/J
lievanec/J
linotyp/J
listen/J
lisaj/J
liter/J
lizing/J
loj/J
lopar/J
luc/J
ludoop/CL
luster/J
lykovec/CL
maco/L
magnetovec/J
makcen/J
malinac/J
manever/J
Manchester/J
manometer/J
marias/J
mastenec/J
matrac/J
mec/J
medved/L
medzistupen/J
mencester/J
mensenec/J
mesiac/J
metal/J
meter/J
miesac/J
mikrofis/J
mililiter/J
misal/J
miting/BJ
mlandravec/J
mociar/J
modrotlac/J
monolog/J
motocykel/J
mozol/J
mravec/CL
mroz/L
multimeter/J
mysacinec/J
nadstavec/J
napinac/J
nasobenec/J
nasycovac/J
navej/J
neboziec/J
nesvar/J
nitovac/J
novoplast/J
noziar/J
nylon/J
obedar/J
obracac/J
ocel/J
odboj/J
odfarbovac/J
odlakovac/J
odlucovac/J
odmocnenec/J
odparovac/J
odstavec/J
odstiepenec/J
odtien/J
ohen/J
ohnostroj/J
ohrievac/J
okraj/J
oldomas/J
olej/J
oltar/J
operenec/J
orchester/J
ortiel/J
osemvalec/J
ostrekovac/J
osusovac/J
osial/J
otcenas/J
ovcinec/J
ovos/J
pahyl/J
pajasen/J
pakluc/J
palac/J
papagaj/J
paprikas/J
paranoja/J
patboj/J
patricij/J
pecen/J
peles/J
peniaz/J
pes/L
petrolej/J
piedestal/J
pichliac/J
pinc/J
piskor/L
pisoar/J
pitvorec/J
plac/J
plamen/J
plebej/J
plesnivec/J
plevinec/J
plnometer/J
plural/J
pluzgier/J
Plzen/J
pocitac/J
podbel/J
podnoz/J
podstavec/J
pokal/J
pokoj/JN
polarimeter/J
polmesiac/J
polokosela/J
polvers/J
poniklec/J
popol/J
posilnovac/J
postrekovac/J
potenciometer/J
pramen/J
prasacinec/J
predaj/J
predvoj/J
premietac/J
prepisovac/J
prerazac/J
presekavac/J
preslap/J
pridrzovac/J
priechod/J
pripoj/J
prstenec/J
prsiplast/J
puc/J
pukanec/J
punc/J
pupavec/J
pupen/J
puskvorec/J
radar/J
radioprijimac/J
rak/L
ramec/J
ranc/J
rapkac/J
raroh/L
razen/J
regal/BJ
remenec/J
repertoar/J
retazec/J
rezanec/J
rezervar/J
riadkovac/J
rod/J
rohac/L
roj/J
rozbocovac/J
rozmetavac/J
rozmrazovac/J
rozpredaj/J
rozpustac/J
rozsievac/J
rozstrekovac/J
rozvadzac/J
rubas/J
rumenec/J
ruzenec/J
rybarik/L
rychlovaric/J
rys/L
sadrovec/J
samcek/L
samec/CL
sandal/J
scitanec/J
semenac/J
semester/J
sendvic/J
sihel/J
sirotinec/J
sivko/L
skalpel/J
skicar/J
skuter/J
slavik/L
sled/L
slimak/L
sliz/J
smec/J
smrtihlav/L
snar/J
sokel/J
somar/L
spiezovec/J
spoj/J
sprej/J
srnec/CL
srsen/L
stavovec/J
stoj/J
striekanec/J
strzen/J
sucinitel/J
sumec/CL
susen/J
svist/CJ
safel/J
sechtar/J
sestorak/L
sianec/J
simpanz/L
sindel/J
skopec/J
skorec/CL
slabikar/J
slachtenec/J
spic/J
stajerak/L
stepenec/J
stipec/J
strkac/L
stvorec/J
svab/L
tachometer/J
tanier/J
tatos/CL
tepovac/J
terier/L
termit/BL
tetrov/L
tchor/L
tien/J
tiger/CL
toliar/J
trhanec/J
trilobit/L
trn/J
trtac/J
tur/L
tus/J
udaj/J
ul/J
ustalovac/J
vander/J
vehikel/J
veljaster/CL
veniec/J
viacboj/J
vlasec/J
vlk/L
volej/J
vol/L
vorvan/L
vos/L
vrabec/J
vrubel/J
vtak/L
vtakopysk/L
vydaj/J
vymol/J
vysavac/J
vyvoj/J
zajac/L
zajko/L
zajo/L
zapinac/J
zavej/J
zavinac/L
zlepenec/J
zretel/J
zubac/L
zubor/L
zver/L
zvierac/J
zvrastovac/J
zaltar/J
ziar/J
zivocich/L
zltohlav/L
zltochvost/L
zralok/L
zrebec/CJ
